Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-615
Individual's rights.

The existence of a surrogate for an individual under the Health Care Surrogacy Act does not waive the right of the individual to routine hygiene, nursing, and comfort care and the usual and typical provision of nutrition and hydration.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 15.